Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2. Licensing Authority

Cross references. —

As to revocation of license or permit by commission, see §

12-7-201

.

§ 12-2-201.
Wholesale license for sale of malt beverages only; fee.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection a wholesale license authorizing the sale of malt beverages only may be granted by the division to microbreweries and malt beverage wholesalers resident within this state. Wholesale licensees have the exclusive right to sell malt beverages at wholesale. Any qualified person desiring a wholesale license shall apply to the division on forms to be provided and pay a license fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) annually in advance. A wholesale license issued under this subsection shall be subject to the following:

Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this section, no brewery or malt beverage importer may have any legal ownership interest, in whole or in part, in the license, business, assets or corporate stock of a licensee under this subsection;

The division may issue a temporary wholesale license under this subsection to a brewery or malt beverage importer if a current licensee who has been granted distribution rights for a brand in a designated sales territory is unable to service the territory as a result of the loss of his license, bankruptcy or insolvency, and the loss of license, bankruptcy or insolvency is not the result of action by the brewery or malt beverage importer that is prohibited under the franchise agreement. A temporary license under this paragraph may be issued for a period not to exceed one (1) year and shall be limited to the sale of products in the designated territory;

Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to impair any contract between a brewery, microbrewery, malt beverage manufacturer or malt beverage importer and a distributor.

Each applicant shall submit to the division a statement under oath designating clearly the geographical territory within which the applicant will sell and deliver malt beverages to qualified retail liquor and malt beverage licensees or permittees only. The territory is to be that designated by the brewer or brewer’s authorized agent whose product the applicant sells. The application shall state that malt beverages sold by the applicant may be purchased by all retail liquor licensees or malt beverage permittees, and that the applicant will maintain a warehouse and delivery facilities within the territory designated. This subsection does not apply to a licensed malt beverage wholesaler when there has been no territorial designation of a brand by a brewer or the brewer’s authorized agent to another licensed wholesaler. The division may authorize a licensed wholesaler to annually purchase not more than one hundred fifteen (115) gallons of any unassigned brand. A retail liquor licensee or malt beverage permittee shall purchase all malt beverages for retail sale only from a Wyoming wholesale malt beverage licensee.

A malt beverage wholesaler may sell to or purchase from another malt beverage wholesaler only those products the purchasing wholesaler is licensed to sell within his designated territory. A copy of the invoice of the transaction shall be submitted to the division by the seller. State excise tax shall be reported and paid by the licensed malt beverage wholesaler who has imported the products into the state.

The division may grant the number of licenses it deems appropriate and at points within the state as it may select.

All Wyoming breweries and all malt beverage wholesalers shall be under the direct supervision of the division and subject to all the provisions of this title and the rules and regulations of the department.

Nothing in this section limits the division’s exclusive authority to wholesale alcoholic liquors.

The division:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

Shall not grant a license for a brewery and a microbrewery to the same producer.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 19; ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, §§ 53-102, 53-219; W.S. 1957, §§ 12-21, 12-39(j); Laws 1973, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 12-2-123,

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1981, ch. 104, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1992, ch. 74, § 2; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; 1999, ch. 61, § 1; 2013 ch. 93, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 22, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendment,

in (a) in the introductory paragraph added “Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection,” deleted “breweries” in the first sentence, added the last sentence; and added (a)(i) through (a)(iii).

Laws 2013, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (f) substituted “division's” for “commission's.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iii) added “microbrewery” following “brewery.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "Notwithstanding W.S.

12-2-203

" at the beginning of (g); deleted "The division" at the beginning (g)(iii); and made related changes.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (g)(i), which read, "May authorize the sale of products of a microbrewery for off-premises sale through existing licensed wholesale malt beverage distributors according to W.S.

12-2-201

and subject to W.S.

12-2-304

,

12-3-101

and

12-3-102

; and"; and repealed (g)(ii), which read "Shall assess to the microbrewery a fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) for the off-premises sale of microbrewery products."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to hearing before revocation or suspension of liquor license, 35 ALR2d 1067.

Revocation or suspension of liquor license because of drinking or drunkenness on part of licensee or his associates, 36 ALR3d 1301.

§ 12-2-202.
Sales by railroads and chartered transportation services; limited transportation liquor license; fees; chartered transportation services defined.

The division may authorize sales by railroads and by any charter transportation service. Under the authority of a limited transportation liquor license, railroads and chartered transportation services may sell alcoholic liquor or malt beverages when moved into and through the state in dining cars, club cars, observation cars and pullman cars attached to trains or in the passenger compartment of a chartered transportation vehicle. Upon application, the division may issue a limited transportation liquor license for each scheduled train or chartered transportation vehicle upon which alcoholic liquor or malt beverages are to be sold, subject to the following terms and maximum fees:

A license valid for one (1) twenty-four (24) hour period at a fee of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00). Any applicant may be issued more than one (1) license under this paragraph during any one (1) calendar year;

A license valid for one (1) year at a fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

It is unlawful to sell alcoholic liquor or malt beverages on railroad cars or chartered transportation vehicles without a limited transportation liquor license required by this section.

As used in this section, “chartered transportation service” means “contract motor carrier” as defined by W.S. 31-18-101(a)(x)(A).

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 53-214; W.S. 1957, § 12-17; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-114; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (a).

State has power to prohibit, regulate and control

the traffic in and the sale and use of intoxicating liquors within its borders. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

Laws circumscribe scope of license. —

The most that the Wyoming liquor licensing laws do is to circumscribe the scope and extent of the wholesale or retail sales license. Lamp Liquors, Inc. v. Adolph Coors Co., 563 F.2d 425, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 11486 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

§ 12-2-203.
Manufacturing and rectifying; importing and industry representatives; licensing; fees.

The division shall grant a manufacturer’s license authorizing the manufacture or rectification of alcoholic liquor or an importer’s license authorizing the importation of alcoholic liquor to a qualified resident within this state who submits an application to the division on forms provided by the division and pays an annual license fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for each license. A person may be issued both a manufacturer’s license and an importer’s license. Applicants for a manufacturer’s license shall submit with their application a copy of the applicant’s federal basic permit issued by the United States department of the treasury alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau and shall be subject to on-site inspections by the division.

The Wyoming liquor division shall grant a class A industry representative license for alcoholic liquor suppliers to a qualified individual who submits an application to the division on forms provided by the division accompanied by an annual license fee of not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). A class A industry representative shall have a written statement from any vendor whose products the applicant proposes to represent. The class A industry representative shall be published in the division’s price catalog with the products from any vendor represented by him and shall be authorized to request that the division list or delist products from the vendor represented by him.

The division shall grant a class B industry representative license for alcohol liquor suppliers to a qualified individual who submits an application to the division on forms provided by the division accompanied by an annual license fee of not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). A class B industry representative shall be employed or managed by a class A industry representative. A class B industry representative shall have a written statement from the class A industry representative designating any vendor whose products he is authorized to represent.

The division shall grant a class C temporary special event industry representative license to any individual twenty-one (21) years of age or older who submits an application on a form supplied by the division for a fee of not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per event.

No class A industry representative shall be employed by a licensee as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(viii), except that this subsection shall not apply to malt beverage wholesalers authorized under W.S.

12-2-201

, manufacturers authorized under this section, microbrewery permit holders authorized under W.S.

12-4-415

or winery permit holders authorized under W.S.

12-4-414

.

A holder of a manufacturer’s license under subsection (a) of this section who is a federally licensed distiller or rectifier may dispense free of charge at the site identified on the manufacturer’s license samples in quantities not to exceed one and one-half (1.5) ounces of their product manufactured at the site identified on the manufacturer’s license and no more than three (3) ounces of samples per consumer per day. The dispensing of samples shall be subject to the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

and the licensed building provisions provided in W.S.

12-5-201

.

The local licensing authority may issue to the holder of a manufacturer’s license granted under subsection (a) of this section who is a federally licensed distiller or rectifier:

A satellite manufacturer’s permit which allows the permittee to sell product manufactured at the site identified on the manufacturer’s license at not more than two (2) satellite locations within Wyoming separate from its manufacturing site under the original permit. Products sold at a manufacturer’s satellite location may be obtained through the division as provided by W.S. 12-2-303(a). If a satellite location is situated within the property boundary of the manufacturing site, the product may be distributed directly from the permit holder’s manufacturing site subject to W.S. 12-2-303(d). The satellite manufacturer’s permit may be issued on application to the appropriate licensing authority. The local licensing authority may require a public hearing and the payment of an additional permit fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per satellite location. The satellite manufacturer’s permit shall be subject to the terms and conditions of W.S.

12-4-106

, the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

and the licensed building provisions pursuant to W.S.

12-5-201

;

A manufacturer’s off-premises permit authorizing the permittee to sell product manufactured at the site identified on the manufacturer’s license only for sales at meetings, conventions, private parties, dinners and other similar gatherings to promote their product. No permittee holding a manufacturer’s off-premises permit shall sell or permit consumption of any of their manufactured product off the premises described in the permit. An off-premises permit shall be issued for one (1) twenty-four (24) hour period, subject to the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

. No holder of a manufacturer’s license shall receive more than twelve (12) off-premises permits in any one (1) calendar year. An off-premises permit may be issued on application to the appropriate licensing authority. The local licensing authority may require payment of an additional permit fee of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per twenty-four (24) hour period.

For purposes of subsections (a), (f) and (g) of this section:

“Distiller” includes any person who:

Produces distilled spirits from any source or substance;

Brews or makes mash, wort or wash fit for distillation or for the production of distilled spirits, other than the making or using of mash, wort or wash in the authorized production of wine or beer, or the production of vinegar by fermentation;

By any process separates alcoholic spirits from any fermented substance; or

Making or keeping mash, wort or wash, has a still in operation at the site identified on the manufacturer’s license.

“In operation” means is currently being operated or has been operated in the preceding twelve (12) months with all necessary permits;

“Manufacture” or “manufactured” means distilling or rectifying and bottling or packaging any spirituous fluid, substance or compound intended for beverage purposes which contains at least one-half of one percent (.5%) alcohol by volume;

“Rectifier” includes any person who colors, flavors or otherwise processes distilled spirits by distillation, blending, percolating or other processes.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1997, ch. 164, § 1; 2005, ch. 156, § 1; 2012, ch. 19, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, to provide for class A, B, and C industry representatives, and to provide regulations, licensure and fee provisions for each class, and in (a), thrice substituted “division” for “commission.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (f) through (h).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in the center of (g).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “or malt beverages” following “or alcoholic liquor”, and added the last sentence; substituted “at the site identified on the manufacturer's license” for “on site”, inserted “at the site identified on the manufacturer's license” and made a related change in (f) and (g); in (f) substituted “three (3) ounces of samples” for “two (2) samples”; in the first sentence of (g), inserted “granted”; in the introductory language of (h), added “(a)”; in (h)(i)(D), substituted “still in operation at the site identified on the manufacturer's license” for “still in his possession or use”; inserted present (h)(ii) and (h)(iii), and redesignated former (h)(ii) as (h)(iv).

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “licensed building” for “dispensing room” in (f) and (g).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in present (g)(i), substituted “Products sold” for “All products sold” and “location may be” for “location shall be” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (g), added (i) designation, added (ii), and made related changes.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "domiciled within this state" following "qualified individual" in the first sentence of (b); deleted "domiciled within this state" following "qualified individual" in the first sentence of (c); and added ", except that this subsection shall not apply to malt beverage wholesalers authorized under W.S.

12-2-201

, manufacturers authorized under this section, microbrewery permit holders authorized under W.S.

12-4-415

or winery permit holders authorized under W.S.

12-4-414

" in (e).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (g)(i), substituted "two (2)" for "one (1)," "locations" for "location," "a" for "the" preceding "satellite location" in the third sentence, and added "per satellite location" in the fifth sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 12-2-204.
Out-of-state shipment of manufactured wine; license; fees; restrictions; conditions.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any person currently licensed in its state of domicile as an alcoholic liquor or malt beverage manufacturer, importer, wholesaler or retailer who obtains an out-of-state shipper’s license, as provided in this section, may ship no more than a total of one hundred eight (108) liters of manufactured wine directly to any one (1) household in this state in any twelve (12) month period.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any person currently licensed in its state of domicile as an alcoholic liquor or malt beverage manufacturer, importer, wholesaler or retailer who obtains an out-of-state shipper’s license, as provided in this section, may ship to any Wyoming retail establishment which holds a liquor license in this state or any household in this state any manufactured wine which is not listed with the liquor division as part of its inventory and distribution operation.

Before sending any shipment to a household or to a licensed retailer in this state, the out-of-state shipper shall:

File an application with the liquor division of the department of revenue;

Pay a license fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) to the liquor division;

Provide a true copy of its current alcoholic liquor or malt beverage license issued in its state of domicile to the liquor division;

Provide such other information as may be required by the liquor division; and

Obtain from the liquor division an out-of-state shipper’s license, after the division conducts such investigation as it deems necessary.

Any out-of-state shippers licensed pursuant to this section shall:

Not ship more than a total of one hundred eight (108) liters of manufactured wine to any one (1) household in this state during any twelve (12) month period. In the event any out-of-state shipper ships more than ninety (90) liters of any particular manufactured wine to any combination of households or licensed retailers in this state, the out-of-state shipper shall offer to sell the manufactured wine to the liquor division at wholesale prices;

Ship manufactured wine only to an individual who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age for such individual’s personal use and not for resale. No out-of-state shipper shall ship any malt beverage or spirituous liquor to any person in this state. No out-of-state shipper shall ship any malt beverage or spirituous liquor to any retail establishment which holds a liquor license in this state;

Ensure that all shipping containers of manufactured wine shipped pursuant to this section are conspicuously labeled with the words: “CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES. ADULT (OVER 21) SIGNATURE REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”;

Ensure that all shipments into this state are made by a duly licensed carrier and further ensure that such carriers comply with the requirement to obtain an adult signature;

Remit a tax of twelve percent (12%) of the retail price for each shipment of manufactured wine to the liquor division. Each out-of-state shipper shall file a monthly report with the liquor division and include a copy of the invoice for each shipment of manufactured wine and remit any tax due. The report shall be filed with the liquor division not later than the tenth of the month following the month in which the shipment was made. Any report filed late with the liquor division shall be subject to a late filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Maintain records for at least three (3) years as will permit the liquor division to ascertain the truthfulness of the information filed and permit the division to perform an audit of the licensee’s records upon reasonable request; and

Be deemed to have consented to the personal jurisdiction of the liquor division or any other state agency and the courts of this state concerning enforcement of this section and any related laws, rules or regulations.

The out-of-state shipper shall annually renew its license with the liquor division by paying a renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), providing a true copy of its current alcoholic liquor or malt beverage license issued in its state of domicile, and further providing other information as may be required.

Any person who makes, participates in, transports, imports or receives a shipment in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each shipment shall constitute a separate offense. Where the person holds an out-of-state shipper’s license, license suspension or revocation may be in addition to or in lieu of the foregoing penalties.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 84, § 1; 2015 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “thirty-six (36) liters”
for “eighteen (18) liters” in (a) and (d)(i); and in (b), inserted “or any household in this state” preceding “any manufactured wine.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "one hundred eight (108)" for "thirty-six (36)" in (a); and substituted "one hundred eight (108)" for "thirty-six (36)" in (d)(i).